Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5681YH (3) 91 th/ns H.F. 2024 Section 1. Section 321.438, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. A person shall not operate on the highway a motor 3 vehicle equipped with a front windshield, a any of the 4 following: 5 (1) A front windshield that meets a minimum standard of 6 transparency of less than seventy percent light transmittance. 7 (2) A side window to the immediate right or left of the 8 driver, or a sidewing forward of and to the left or right of the 9 driver which is excessively dark or reflective so that it is 10 difficult for a person outside the motor vehicle to see into 11 the motor vehicle through the windshield, window, or sidewing , 12 that meets a minimum standard of transparency of less than 13 fifty percent light transmittance . 14 (3) A side or rear window other than as described in 15 subparagraph (2) that meets a minimum standard of transparency 16 of less than thirty-five percent light transmittance. 17 a. The department shall adopt rules establishing a minimum 18 measurable standard of transparency which shall apply to 19 violations of this subsection . 20 b. This subsection does not apply to a person who operates 21 a motor vehicle owned or leased by a federal, state, or local 22 law enforcement agency if the operation is part of the personâs 23 official duties. 24